Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2813
Occurrence, defined.

Occurrence shall mean the event, incident, or happening, and the acts or omissions incident thereto, which proximately cause injuries or damages for which reimbursement is or may be claimed by the patient or his representative.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 13.